Nevada, session 83, SB322.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each person who is elected or appointed to serve as a
member of the Board of Regents shall complete training for
professional development during the first and third year of each
term of the member, which must consist of not less than 6 hours of
instruction during each year that such training is required. Except
as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the instruction required
pursuant to this subsection may cover any of the following topics:
(a) The Open Meeting Law, including, without limitation, the
provisions of chapter 241 of NRS;
(b) The elimination of bias and discrimination in higher
education;
(c) Laws relating to public records, including, without
limitation, the provisions of chapter 239 of NRS;
(d) Strategies for the improvement of campus safety;
(e) Laws and standards relating to the ethical obligations of
public officers and employees, including, without limitation, the
provisions of chapter 281A of NRS;
(f) The system of public higher education in this State,
including, without limitation, the provisions of this chapter and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(g) The duties and responsibilities of the members of the Board
of Regents, the officers and staff of the Board of Regents, the
Chancellor, the staff of the Chancellor and the presidents of the
institutions within the System, including, without limitation,
circumstances under which the Board of Regents is required to
consult with such persons;
(h) The existing relationship and interaction between the
Board of Regents and the System with the Legislative, Executive
and Judicial branches of the government of this State;
(i) Financial management, including, without limitation,
information concerning oversight, accountability and audits;
(j) Information relating to institutional mission differentiation
and accreditation standards in higher education;
(k) The fiduciary duties of the members of the Board of
Regents, including, without limitation, the provisions of NRS
396.122 and other applicable provisions of law;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(l) Laws and regulations relating to employment and
contracts;
(m) Parliamentary procedures applicable to meetings of the
Board of Regents;
(n) The promotion of academic freedom and shared
governance in institutions of higher education;
(o) Best practices relating to searches for executive officers in
higher education; or
(p) Other topics of instruction not described in paragraphs (a)
to (o), inclusive, that relate to the duties of the Board of Regents.
2. Each member of the Board of Regents is required to
complete, as part of the training for professional development
required pursuant to subsection 1, instruction covering the topics
described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1 each year the
member is required to complete such training pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. The Secretary of the Board shall assist each member of the
Board of Regents as necessary to complete the training for
professional development required pursuant to subsection 1,
including, without limitation, arranging for experts on the topics
described in paragraphs (a) to (p), inclusive, of subsection 1 to
facilitate or provide the required instruction. Such an expert may
be a person who is employed by the System, or any state or local
agency, and whose duties relate to the training that the person has
agreed to provide.
4. Upon completing the training for professional development
required pursuant to subsection 1, a member of the Board of
Regents must provide evidence of the completion of the training to
the Secretary of the Board. If a member fails to complete the
training required pursuant to subsection 1, or fails to provide
evidence of the completion of the training to the Secretary in
accordance with this subsection, the Secretary shall:
(a) Publish a notice of such noncompliance in a conspicuous
manner on an Internet website maintained by the Board of
Regents; and
(b) Provide written notice of the noncompliance to the other
members of the Board of Regents.
5. Each member of the Board of Regents is entitled to receive
compensation for each 3 hours of training for professional
development that the member completes pursuant to subsection 1
outside of a meeting of the Board. The amount of compensation
for each 3 hours of training must be equal to the salary that each
member of the Board of Regents is entitled to receive pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
subsection 1 of NRS 396.070 for each meeting of the Board that
the member attends. A member may not receive compensation
pursuant to this subsection for more than 18 hours of training in a
calendar year.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)